Colorado, session 2026A, HB1108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-412, add
(7.5) as follows:
24-33.5-412. Functions of bureau - legislative review -
interagency cooperation with reporting functions - processing time
for criminal history record checks - computer crime - synthetic
cannabinoids enforcement - definition.
(7.5) (a) THE BUREAU IS AUTHORIZED TO SUBMIT APPLICANT
FINGERPRINTS TO THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION TO BE
RETAINED IN THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION'S RAP BACK
SERVICE. ALL APPLICANT FINGERPRINTS SUBMITTED BY THE BUREAU TO
THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION TO CONDUCT A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD CHECK ARE RETAINED IN THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION'S DATABASE FOR THE RAP BACK SERVICE. APPLICANT
FINGERPRINTS SUBMITTED TO THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
MAY BE USED FOR FUTURE SEARCHES, INCLUDING LATENT SEARCHES.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7.5), "RAP BACK SERVICE"
MEANS THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION'S SERVICE THAT ALLOWS
AUTHORIZED AGENCIES TO RECEIVE NOTIFICATION OF ACTIVITY ON
INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE SUBMITTED TO A CIVIL FINGERPRINT-BASED
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK THAT UTILIZES THE FEDERAL BUREAU
OF INVESTIGATION'S RECORDS.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. (1) This
-2- HB26-1108

act takes effect July 1, 2027; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this
act or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period
after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect July 1, 2027.
(2) This act applies to fingerprints submitted to the Colorado
bureau of investigation on or after the applicable effective date of this act.
-3- HB26-1108